California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
(a) The board shall review the benefits received by retired or disabled pilots and inland pilots and their surviving spouses every three years or when the cumulative percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index (San Francisco Bay Area) has exceeded 12 percent, whichever occurs first.

(b) The board may increase the monthly pensions specified in Section 1163. Those increases shall take into consideration the maritime industry practice in the United States as brought to the attention of the board by the pilots, inland pilots, or the industry. The increase shall not exceed 50 percent of the cumulative increase in the Consumer Price Index (San Francisco Bay Area). Monthly pensions for retired pilots, inland pilots, or their surviving spouses who have been retired less than the full three-year interval between adjustments shall increase on a pro rata basis according to the number of months that those persons have been retired prior to that adjustment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1192, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1168.

The board may review the pension plan and make any recommendations it deems necessary for changes in the plan. Monthly pensions shall not be adjusted except as provided by Section 1167.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 639, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Licensing of Pilots [1170. - 1184.]



  ARTICLE 1. Issuance of License [1170. - 1179.]

1170.

The board shall appoint and license the number of pilots which is sufficient to carry out the purposes of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1422, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.1.

In determining the number of pilots needed, pursuant to Section 1170, the board shall take into consideration the findings and declarations in Sections 1100 and 1101, the industry’s current economic trends, fluctuations in the number of vessel calls, the size of vessels, whether the need for pilotage is increasing or decreasing, and the 1986 manpower study adopted by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 4.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.2.

Before changing the number of pilots which may be licensed pursuant to this division, the board shall conduct a hearing pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1653, Sec. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.3.

(a) The board shall adopt, by regulation, a pilot’s conflict-of-interest code, which shall include, but need not be limited to, a provision specifying that a pilot shall not have any interest in, or derive any income from, any tugboat in operation on Monterey Bay and the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun. This requirement of divestiture does not apply to the ownership of barges and vessels similar to barges.

(b) The conflict-of-interest code shall not prohibit the ownership of stock in any corporation registered on a national securities exchange or on the National Market System of the NASDAQ Stock Market, pursuant to Section 78f of Title 15 of the United States Code, which may own tugboats in operation on Monterey Bay and the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 177, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1171.

(a) The board shall have the sole authority to determine the qualifications for obtaining a license as a pilot pursuant to this division, determine who shall have the license, and issue the license.

(b) A person possessing a valid state pilot’s license on January 1, 1985, is hereby licensed as if the license was granted by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 14.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1171.5.

(a) The board shall adopt, by regulation, licensing standards that equal or exceed standards for obtaining federal endorsements and that conform with and support the state policy specified in Sections 1100 and 1101.

(b) The board shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations that require pilots to be qualified to perform all pilot duties.

(c) The board shall adopt, by regulation, training standards and a training program for pilot trainees, and continuing education standards and a continuing education program for pilots. In the case of pilot trainees, the training program shall be for a minimum of one year and a maximum of three years. In the case of pilots,
 the board shall specify the type, nature, duration, and frequency of the continuing education required and the identity of the pilots who are required to undergo continuing education in the next 12-month period. Pursuant to Section 1182, the license of a pilot may be revoked or suspended if he or she fails to complete the continuing education required by this subdivision during the period specified. The board shall also require that an evaluation of the pilot’s performance be prepared by the institution selected by the board to provide pilot continuing education, and the institution shall provide copies of the evaluation to the pilot and to the board.

(d) The board shall adopt, by regulation, the qualifications, standards, and rating criteria for admission of pilot trainees to the training program. Notwithstanding subdivision (f), the board shall administer and conduct the pilot trainee admission selection in accordance with the regulations for
 admission.

(e) The board shall establish a pilot evaluation committee consisting of five active pilots who each have at least 10 years’ experience as a pilot on the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun. The board shall select the members of the pilot evaluation committee. A member may not serve for more than two four-year terms, except that two of the initial members appointed to the pilot evaluation committee shall serve terms of two years.

(f) The pilot evaluation committee shall conduct and supervise the pilot trainee training program pursuant to the direction and regulation of the board and consistent with the intent of this division.

(g) The board shall issue a certificate of completion to each pilot trainee who satisfactorily completes the training program. The board shall not issue a pilot’s license to
 a person who does not receive a certificate of completion of the training program from the board, although the board may refuse to issue a pilot license to a pilot trainee who has received this certificate.

(h) The training program for pilot trainees and the continuing education program for pilots shall be funded from revenues collected for these purposes as determined by the board pursuant to Sections 1195 and 1196 and deposited into the Board of Pilot Commissioners’ Special Fund pursuant to Section 1159.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 15.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1171.6.

(a) There shall be an examination fee to be charged in an amount established by the board to each applicant to the pilot trainee training program who participates in any written or simulator examinations established by the board for the purposes of determining admission to the pilot trainee training program pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1171.5. The fee shall be charged only to those who actually participate in an examination and shall not exceed the administrative costs to the board of preparing and administering the examination.

(b) The moneys charged and collected from the applicant pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be paid to the board and deposited into the Board of Pilot Commissioners’
 Special Fund pursuant to Section 1159. The moneys shall be used only to fund the pilot trainee training program in the manner established by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 16.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1172.

Pilots licensed by the board shall be carefully examined as to their qualifications. A license as a pilot shall be granted for a term of 12 months. The license shall be renewed annually unless the board has good cause to withhold renewal pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1180) of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1256.)
-------------------------------------------

1173.

An application for a pilot’s license shall be made in writing to the board, stating such information as the board by rule and regulation may require.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1256.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.

A pilot’s license shall be issued in the name of the State of California and contain a designation of the waters for which it is intended. The license shall be signed by the president of the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1256.)
-------------------------------------------

1175.

No person shall be licensed as a pilot unless all of the following requirements are met:

(a) The person can meet the qualifications set by the board, including age limitations, if any.

(b) The person is of good mental and physical health and good moral character. 

(c) The person possesses the requisite skill and experience as a navigator and pilot, together with practical knowledge of the currents, tide, soundings, bearings, and distances of the several shoals, and the rocks, bars, points of landings, lights, and fog signals of, or pertaining to, the navigation of the pilot ground for which the person applies for a license to act as a pilot.

(d) The person can satisfy the board that the person has means available for boarding and leaving vessels which the person may be called upon to pilot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1653, Sec. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

1176.

(a) The board shall appoint a physician or physicians who are qualified to determine the suitability of a person to perform his or her duties as a pilot or a pilot trainee in accordance with subdivision (c).

(b) An applicant for a pilot trainee position or for a pilot license, a pilot trainee, or a pilot seeking renewal of his or her license shall undergo a physical examination by a board-appointed physician in accordance with standards prescribed by the board. Within 30 days prior to the examination, the applicant or licensee shall submit to the physician conducting the physical examination a complete list of all prescribed medications
 being taken by or administered to the applicant or licensee.

(c) On the basis of both the examination and an evaluation of the effects of the prescription medications named on the submitted list, the physician shall designate to the board whether or not the pilot or pilot trainee is fit to perform his or her duties as a pilot or a pilot trainee.

(d) The license of a pilot shall not be renewed unless he or she is found fit for duty pursuant to subdivision (c).

(e) If a pilot or a pilot trainee is prescribed either a new dosage of a medication or a new medication, or suspends the use of a prescribed medication, he or she shall, within 10 days, submit that information to the board-appointed physician having possession
 of the prescribed medication list submitted pursuant to subdivision (b). If the physician receives the updated information, the physician shall determine whether or not the medication change affects the licensee’s or trainee’s fitness for duty. If the physician determines that the medication change results in the pilot or pilot trainee being unfit for duty, the physician shall inform the board.

(f) The board may terminate a pilot trainee or suspend or revoke the license of a pilot who fails to submit the prescribed medication information required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 17.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1176.5.

(a) At the time of the physical examination required by Section 1176, a trainee or an applicant for a trainee position shall disclose to the board-appointed physician conducting the physical examination all of the following information, if applicable:

(1) If at any time prior to the examination the trainee or applicant for a trainee position has been rendered incapable of safely operating a vessel or any other motor vehicle because of alcoholism, excessive and chronic use of alcoholic beverages, or addiction to, or habitual use of, any drug.

(2) If at any time prior to the examination the trainee or applicant for a trainee position has
 been addicted to the use of narcotic drugs or has participated in a narcotic treatment program.

(3) If at any time prior to the examination the trainee or applicant for a trainee position has suffered from a disorder characterized by lapses of consciousness or has experienced, within the last three years, either a lapse of consciousness or an episode of marked confusion caused by any medical condition that may bring about recurrent lapses, or has any physical or mental disability, disease, or disorder that could affect the safe operation of a vessel or motor vehicle.

(b) At the time of the physical examination, a licensee shall disclose to the board-appointed physician conducting the physical examination pursuant to Section 1176 all of the following information, if applicable:

(1) If at any time during the year prior
 to the examination the licensee applicant has been rendered incapable of safely operating a vessel or any other motor vehicle because of alcoholism, excessive and chronic use of alcoholic beverages, or addiction to, or habitual use of, any drug.

(2) If at any time during the year prior to the examination the licensee has been addicted to the use of narcotic drugs or participated in a narcotic treatment program.

(3) If at any time during the year prior to the examination the licensee has suffered from a disorder characterized by lapses of consciousness or has experienced either a lapse of consciousness or an episode of marked confusion caused by any medical condition that may bring about recurrent lapses, or has any physical or mental disability, disease, or disorder that could affect the safe operation of a vessel or any other motor vehicle.

(c) The board may refuse to admit an applicant to the training program, continue a trainee in the training program, or issue or renew a license to any person if the board-appointed physician conducting the physical examination required pursuant to Section 1176 determines that the trainee applicant, trainee, license applicant, or licensee excessively or habitually uses, or is addicted to, alcoholic beverages, narcotics, or dangerous drugs.

(d) The board shall not admit an applicant to the training program, continue a trainee in the program, issue a license to a pilot license applicant, or renew a pilot license for any applicant who fails to submit the information required by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 794, Sec. 5.   (SB 1408)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1177.

(a) All pilots licensed pursuant to this division shall have and maintain proper federal endorsements allowing them to pilot on the high seas and on all waters of the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun, excluding the San Joaquin River and the Sacramento deep water ship channel.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), all pilots issued original licenses pursuant to this division after December 31, 1987, shall have and maintain proper federal endorsements allowing them to pilot on the high seas and on all waters of the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun, including the San Joaquin River and the Sacramento deep water ship channel.

(c) All pilots licensed pursuant to this division for Monterey Bay shall have and maintain proper federal endorsements allowing them to pilot on the high seas and on all the waters of Monterey Bay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 177, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1177.5.

(a) The board’s proceedings with regard to the refusal to issue or renew a pilot license shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The board may deny an application for a license without a hearing, if within one year previously, and after proceedings conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, an application from the same applicant has been denied upon the same grounds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 794, Sec. 6.   (SB 1408)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1178.

Persons applying for an original license shall not receive a license unless they have proper federal endorsements allowing them to pilot on the high seas and all the waters of those bays pursuant to Section 1171.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 282, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

1178.5.

(a) Subject to this section, the board shall participate in a pull-notice system, pursuant to Section 1808.1 of the Vehicle Code, with respect to all pilot trainees and all licensees.

(b) The purpose of board participation in a pull-notice system pursuant to this section is to provide the board with a report showing each pilot’s current public record as recorded by the Department of Motor Vehicles, and any subsequent convictions, failures to appear, accidents, driver’s license suspensions, driver’s license revocations, or any other actions taken against the driving privilege or certificate, added to the driver’s record while the notification request remains valid and uncanceled.

(c) As used in this section, participation in the pull-notice system means obtaining a requester code and enrolling all pilots and trainees who are subject to the board’s jurisdiction under that requester code.

(d) The board shall, additionally, obtain a periodic report from the Department of Motor Vehicles at least every 12 months. The board shall verify that each pilot’s and pilot trainee’s driver’s license has not been suspended or revoked and whether the pilot or pilot trainee has been convicted of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 of the Vehicle Code or Section 655.

(e) Upon the termination of a pilot’s license or the removal of a trainee from the training program, the board shall notify the Department of Motor Vehicles to discontinue the driver’s enrollment in the pull-notice system.

(f) For the purposes of the pull-notice system, a pilot and pilot trainee shall be enrolled as if he or she were an employee of the board.

(g) The board shall be exempt from any fees required under the pull-notice system, pursuant to Section 1808.1 of the Vehicle Code.

(h) The board, on an individual basis, shall also request the driving record of every applicant for admission into the pilot training program before granting admission to the training program, and shall request the driving record of every applicant for an original pilot license before issuing a pilot license.

(i) The board, after notice and hearing, may refuse to issue a pilot license or may suspend or revoke the license issued to a pilot if that person has been convicted of a violation of
 Section 23152 or 23153 of the Vehicle Code, or Section 655. A conviction after a plea of nolo contendere is a conviction within the meaning of this section.

(j) The board may refuse to admit an applicant into the pilot training program or may dismiss a pilot trainee from the pilot training program if that person has been convicted of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 of the Vehicle Code or Section 655. A conviction after a plea of nolo contendere is a conviction within the meaning of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 794, Sec. 7.   (SB 1408)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1179.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, any shipping company which regularly employed its employees, or expressed its intent to the board to use its employees, for piloting vessels on the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun on or before July 1, 1983, may employ and use its employees in that manner in lieu of pilots provided under this chapter. However, this use of employees as pilots on foreign flag vessels shall be limited to five vessel calls per year for those shipping companies that have only expressed their intent to use their employees in lieu of pilots. This limitation shall not apply to those shipping companies which regularly employed their employees for piloting vessels prior to July 1, 1983.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1422, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Suspension or Revocation of Licenses [1180. - 1184.]

1180.

If, in the opinion of the board, there is reasonable cause to believe that the public interest requires that a pilot be summarily suspended pending hearing on charges of misconduct that include any of the causes for suspension or revocation specified in Section 1181 or if the board has information that leads it to believe that a pilot has become unable to comply with the standards of health or physical condition requisite to a pilot’s duties, the board may, without hearing, temporarily suspend the license of the pilot for not exceeding 40 days pending hearing and decision on the charges. Unless an accusation on the charge is served on the pilot as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, prior to
 the close of the sixth day after the suspension becomes effective, the temporary suspension terminates at the close of the sixth day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 18.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1180.3.

(a) The board shall establish an incident review committee, which shall be composed of one public member of the board and the executive director. The board shall delegate to the incident review committee the responsibility to review all reports of misconduct or navigational incidents involving pilots or other matters for which a license issued by the board may be revoked or suspended. This subdivision does not apply to an incident involving a pilot aboard a vessel of less than 300 gross tons unless a pilot is required by law.

(b) The incident review committee, with the assistance of one or more investigators, shall investigate the incident, misconduct, or other matter and prepare a
 written report. The incident review committee may call witnesses and request additional information if the incident review committee considers it necessary to conduct a complete investigation. In performing their duties, the members of the incident review committee and its investigators shall act fairly and impartially and shall treat all matters developed or maintained as required by law. The members of the incident review committee and the investigators shall not discuss any investigation with the board or any member of the board until the matter has been finally disposed of by the incident review committee or final action has been taken by the board, as appropriate. The board shall specify, by regulation, the information to be contained in the report, which shall include, but need not be limited to, the following information relating to the incident, misconduct, or other matter:

(1) The name of the vessel, date, location, and identification
 of the pilot.

(2) A description of the weather and sea conditions.

(3) An illustration and description of the incident, misconduct, or other matter under investigation.

(4) An estimate of the damages, if any.

(5) The names of the witnesses providing information relating to the incident, misconduct, or other matter under investigation.

(6) The nature and extent of any injuries.

(7) A summary of any prior investigations of incidents, misconduct, or other matters involving the same pilot designated pursuant to paragraph (1).

(8) Any relevant correspondence or
 records from the United States Coast Guard relating to the incident, misconduct, or other matter under investigation.

(9) A historical record of the actions taken in the investigation and the action taken pursuant to Section 1180.6.

(10) A summary of the factual background of the incident, misconduct, or other matter investigated.

(11) The following information that is not a part of the public record:

(A) The report from the pilot.

(B) The confidential report of the investigator.

(c) Unless an accusation for suspension or revocation of the pilot’s license is served on the pilot as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with
 Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the incident review committee shall present the completed investigation report to the board at the first monthly meeting of the board after the completion of the report. Unless an extension is granted by the board, the report shall be presented within 90 days of the date of the incident, misconduct, or other matter investigated.

(d) The record of the investigation prepared pursuant to subdivision (b) and the final disposition of the incident, misconduct, or other matter shall be retained in the records of the board for 10 years after the completion of the investigation and, except for the items listed in paragraph (11) of subdivision (b), shall be a public record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 19.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1180.6.

(a) The board, after full consideration of the evidence, report, and recommendations presented by the incident review committee relating to an incident, misconduct, or other matter pursuant to Section 1180.3, shall take one or more of the following actions:

(1) Serve an accusation for suspension or revocation of the pilot’s license on the pilot as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, pursuant to Sections 1181 and 1182.

(2) Enter into a written stipulation for corrective action to be performed by the pilot, which may include, but is not limited
 to, further training or supervised practice trips.

(3) Provide counseling for the pilot relating to the duties and obligations of a pilot.

(4) Issue a warning letter of reprimand to the pilot.

(5) Take any other action, as provided in the guidelines adopted pursuant to subdivision (e).

(6) Close the investigation without further action.

(7) Remand the matter to the incident review committee for further investigation.

(b) Action required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be taken by a majority vote of the board.

(c) A member of the board shall not sit on the
 board as a trier of fact for those cases in which he or she has served on the incident review committee recommending action to the board.

(d) The executive director shall note any action taken by the board pursuant to this section in a pilot’s record and shall establish a suspense file to ensure that all training, practice trips, or other corrective action required to be performed pursuant to subdivision (a) by the pilot are completed as required. The executive director shall report to the board each month on the progress of any training, supervised practice trips, or other corrective action or the completion of any other action required pursuant to subdivision (a).

(e) The executive director shall notify the board of a pilot who fails, or refuses, to complete training, practice trips, or other corrective action imposed by the board pursuant to subdivision (a). If the board
 determines that the pilot has intentionally failed to complete training, practice trips, or other corrective action, the board may take additional action as specified in subdivision (a).

(f) The board shall adopt guidelines for the determination by the incident review committee of the action to be taken pursuant to subdivision (a) at the completion of an investigation conducted pursuant to Section 1180.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 20.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1181.

The license of a pilot may be revoked or suspended before its expiration only for reasons of misconduct, which shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Neglect, for 30 days after it becomes due, to render an account to the board of all money received for pilotage.

(b) Neglect, for 30 days after it becomes due, to pay over to the board the percentage of all pilotage money received, as set by the board.

(c) Rendering to the board a false account of pilotage received.

(d) Absence from duty for more
 than one month at any one time without leave granted by the board, unless sickness or personal injury causes the absence.

(e) Refusing to exhibit the pilot license when requested to do so by the master of any vessel boarded.

(f) Intoxication or being under the influence of any substance or combination of substances that so affects the nervous system, brain, or muscles as to impair, to an appreciable degree, the ability to conduct the duties of a pilot while on duty.

(g) Negligently, ignorantly, or willfully running a vessel on shore, or otherwise rendering it liable to damage, or otherwise causing injury to persons or damage to property. However, this subdivision does not apply to a vessel of less than 300 gross tons unless a pilot is required by law.

(h) Willful violation of the rules and regulations adopted by the board for the government of pilots.

(i) Inability to comply with the standards of health or physical condition requisite to the duties of a pilot, but in that case the burden of proving compliance with these standards is upon the licensee, unless prior to the hearing the licensee takes and passes those tests or examinations required by the board.

(j) Failure or refusal, to complete training, practice trips, or other corrective action imposed on that pilot by the board pursuant to Section 1180.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 21.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1182.

If, after a hearing, the board finds that the pilot is guilty of misconduct sufficient for deprivation of the license, the board shall revoke or suspend the license of the pilot. The order shall be entered in the minutes and placed in the record of the pilot maintained pursuant to Section 1157. The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted pursuant to that chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 22.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1183.

(a) Upon notification of nonrenewal of the license, a pilot is entitled to a trial and hearing in the same manner that other charges and accusations against pilots are tried.

(b) In every case of nonrenewal, suspension, or revocation of the license of a pilot for cause, the final decision of the board is subject to judicial review in accordance with law, and the court shall exercise its independent judgment on the evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 23.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1184.

The board shall formally review the executive director with respect to the performance of his or her duties pursuant to this article at least once each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1197, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Pilotage Rates [1190. - 1199.]

1190.

(a) Every vessel spoken inward or outward bound shall pay the following rate of bar pilotage through the Golden Gate and into or out of the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun:

(1) Ten dollars and twenty-six cents ($10.26) per draft foot of the vessel’s deepest draft and fractions of a foot pro rata, and an additional charge of 92.43 mills per high gross registered ton.

(2) (A) A minimum charge for bar pilotage shall be six hundred sixty-two dollars ($662) for each vessel piloted.

(B) On and after January 1, 2022, a minimum charge for
 bar pilotage shall be one thousand eight hundred seventy-five dollars
 ($1,875) for each vessel piloted.

(C) On and after January 1, 2023, a minimum charge for bar pilotage shall be two thousand six hundred dollars ($2,600) for each vessel piloted.

(D) On and after January 1, 2024, a minimum charge for bar pilotage shall be three thousand dollars ($3,000) for each vessel piloted.

(3) The vessel’s deepest draft shall be the maximum draft attained, on a stillwater basis, at any part of the vessel during the course of that transit inward or outward.

(b) The rate specified in subdivision (a) shall apply only to a pilotage that passes through the Golden Gate to or from the high seas to or from a berth within an area
 bounded by the Union Pacific Railroad Bridge to the north and Hunter’s Point to the south. The rate for pilotage to or from the high seas to or from a point past the Union Pacific Railroad Bridge or Hunter’s Point shall include a movement fee in addition to the basic bar pilotage rate, as specified in Section 1191.

(c) The rate established in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be for a trip from the high seas to dock or from the dock to high seas. The rate specified in Section 1191 shall not be charged by pilots for docking and undocking vessels.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 5.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1190.1.

Every vessel that uses a pilot under this division while navigating the waters of Monterey Bay shall pay the rate provided by Section 1190.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 6.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1190.3.

(a) There shall be an additional surcharge imposed per each movement of a vessel using pilot services as is necessary and authorized by the board to recover the costs of the pilot associated with a catastrophic event. The surcharge authorized by this subdivision shall be identified as a catastrophic event surcharge on the invoice of the pilot and separately accounted for in the accounting pursuant to Section 1136.

(b) Subdivision (a) only applies if the board identifies that the costs recorded in a catastrophic event memorandum account are attributable to a specifically identifiable catastrophic event. Catastrophic events include, but are not limited to, fire, earthquake, terrorism,
 act of war, or epidemic, if the event has been declared an emergency or a disaster by a local, state, or federal governmental authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 8.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1191.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that, consistent with the board’s adoption of rate recommendations in May 2002, the Legislature, by statute, adopted a schedule of pilotage rates pursuant to subdivision (c) providing fair and reasonable return to pilots engaged in ship movements or special operations for those movements or operations that are not specified in Section 1190.

(b) A vessel using pilots for ship movements or special operations that do not constitute bar pilotage shall pay the rate specified in the schedule of pilotage rates adopted by the Legislature pursuant to this section.

(c) Consistent
 with the board’s adoption of rate recommendations in May 2002, the minimum rates imposed pursuant to this section that are in effect on December 31, 2002, shall be increased by 26 percent on January 1, 2003; those in effect on December 31, 2003, shall be increased by 26 percent on January 1, 2004; those in effect on December 31, 2004, shall be increased by 14 percent on January 1, 2005; and those in effect on December 31, 2005, shall be increased by 14 percent on January 1, 2006.

(d) Except as specified in Section 1191.1, the rates imposed pursuant to subdivision (c) that are in effect on December 31, 2022, shall be increased by 15 percent on January 1, 2023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 10.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1191.1.

(a) A vessel using pilots for ship movements or special operations that do not constitute bar pilotage shall pay the pilotage rates established in this section.

(b) (1) (A) The minimum charge for each bay move shall be two thousand three hundred dollars ($2,300).

(B) On and after January 1, 2024, the minimum charge for each bay move shall be two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(2) (A) The minimum charge for each river move shall be four thousand five hundred dollars ($4,500).

(B) On and after January 1, 2024, the minimum charge for each river move shall be five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(c) On and after January 1, 2023, the rate for standby time, delay en route, and pilot on board in excess of eight hours shall be four hundred ten dollars ($410) per hour.

(d) On and after January 1, 2023, the rate for cancellation of service after a pilot reports shall be two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(e) On and after January 1, 2023, the rate for cancellation of service with less than four hours notice shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(f) On and after January 1, 2023, the rate for a pilot
 carried away per day shall be five thousand dollars ($5,000) plus expenses incurred in returning.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 11.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1192.

If a vessel that is subject to the payment of pilotage enters any port of Monterey Bay and the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, or Suisun solely by reason of being in distress or requiring care, it shall pay one-half the full pilotage rates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 177, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1193.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 1120, only the following noncommercial vessels that use pilotage services are exempt from the pilotage fees and surcharges established pursuant to this division, except for the board operations surcharge as established and calculated pursuant to Section 1159.1:

(1) Maritime academy training vessels, whether foreign or domestic.

(2) Vessels owned and operated by a nonprofit museum or foundation.

(b) The vessels specified in subdivision (a) are subject to Section 1198.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 455, Sec. 4.   (AB 1888)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1194.

(a) In addition to other charges for pilotage, there shall be an incremental rate of additional mills per high gross registered ton as is necessary and authorized by the board to recover the pilots’ costs of obtaining new pilot boats, including preliminary design and engineering, and of funding design and engineering modifications for the purposes of extending the service life of existing pilot boats, excluding costs for repair or maintenance. The board may adjust the amount of the surcharge established pursuant to this subdivision as necessary to efficiently administer the pilot boat surcharge.
